New York, session 2025-2026, S1828.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new article 2 9-C to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 9-C 4 STATEWIDE CENTRAL REGISTER OF ELDER ABUSE AND MALTREATMENT REPORTS 5 Section 473-m. Definitions. 6 473-n. Statewide central register of elder abuse and maltreat- 7 ment reports. 8 473-o. Mandated reporters. 9 473-p. Penalties for failure to report. 10 473-q. Immunity from liability. 11 § 473-m. Definitions. For the purposes of this article: 12 1. "Abused or maltreated elder" means any resident of New York state 13 who is sixty years of age or older and who is alleged to be the victim 14 of physical abuse, sexual abuse, emotional abuse, passive or self-ne- 15 glect, or financial exploitation, as defined in subdivision six of 16 section four hundred seventy-three of this chapter. 17 2. "Caregiver" means any person who has assumed full or intermittent 18 responsibility for the care or custody of an elderly adult, whether or 19 not such person receives compensation. 20 § 473-n. Statewide central register of elder abuse and maltreatment 21 reports. 1. Subject to appropriation, there shall be established in the 22 office of children and family services a statewide central register of 23 elder abuse and maltreatment reports made pursuant to this article. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03843-01-5 S. 1828 2 1 2. The central register created by this section shall: 2 (a) be capable of receiving telephone calls alleging elder abuse or 3 maltreatment and of immediately identifying prior reports of elder abuse 4 or maltreatment and capable of monitoring the provision of adult protec- 5 tive services twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week. To effectuate 6 this purpose, there shall be a single statewide telephone number, in 7 addition to other special express reporting procedures, that all 8 persons, whether mandated by the law or not, may use to make telephone 9 calls alleging elder abuse or maltreatment and that all persons so 10 authorized may use for determining the existence of prior reports in 11 order to evaluate the condition of the elder; 12 (b) immediately transmit orally or electronically by the office of 13 children and family services to the appropriate adult protective service 14 for investigation, any allegations contained in such telephone calls 15 when they could reasonably constitute a report of elder abuse or 16 maltreatment, including such allegations and any previous reports to the 17 central registry involving the subject of such report or elder named in 18 such report, and any previous reports containing allegations of elder 19 abuse and maltreatment alleged to have occurred in other counties and 20 districts in New York state; 21 (c) immediately transmit orally or electronically to the appropriate 22 local adult protective service for investigation, any telephone call 23 made by a person required to report cases of suspected elder abuse or 24 maltreatment pursuant to this article containing allegations, which if 25 true would constitute elder abuse or maltreatment; 26 (d) convey by the most expedient means available to the appropriate 27 law enforcement agency, district attorney, or other public official 28 empowered to provide necessary aid or assistance, any information 29 contained in a telephone call to the register where the circumstances 30 despite not constituting abuse or maltreatment as defined in this arti- 31 cle, may constitute a crime or an immediate threat to the elder's health 32 or safety; 33 (e) maintain records including, but not limited to: all the informa- 34 tion in the written report; a record of the final disposition of the 35 report; information received from the local social services agency, 36 including services offered and services accepted, the names and identi- 37 fying data, dates and circumstances of any person requesting or receiv- 38 ing information from the register; and any other information which the 39 commissioner believes might be helpful in the furtherance of the 40 purposes of this article; and 41 (f) maintain the confidentiality of reports written, information 42 obtained, or photographs taken concerning such reports in the possession 43 of the office or local departments, except for law enforcement agencies 44 and others deemed by the commissioner of the office of children and 45 family services to have a relevant interest in the materials given their 46 legal or official status. 47 § 473-o. Mandated reporters. 1. The following persons and officials 48 are required to report or cause a report to be made to the central 49 registry under section four hundred seventy-three-n of this article when 50 they have reasonable cause to suspect that an elderly person coming 51 before them in their professional or official capacity is an abused or 52 maltreated elder; or when they have reasonable cause to suspect that the 53 individual is an abused or maltreated elder when the spouse, caregiver, 54 or guardian or other person legally responsible for the elder comes 55 before them in their professional or official capacity and states from 56 personal knowledge facts, conditions or circumstances which, if correct, S. 1828 3 1 would render the elder an abused or maltreated elder: any physician; 2 registered physician assistant; surgeon; medical examiner; pharmacist; 3 coroner; dentist; dental hygienist; osteopath; optometrist; chiroprac- 4 tor; podiatrist; resident; intern; psychologist; registered nurse; 5 social worker; emergency medical technician; mental health professional; 6 licensed marriage and family therapist; licensed mental health counse- 7 lor; licensed psychoanalyst; licensed behavior analyst; hospital person- 8 nel engaged in admission, examination, care or treatment of persons; 9 substance abuse counselor; alcohol use disorder counselor; all persons 10 credentialed by the office of addiction services and supports; licensed 11 master social worker; licensed clinical social worker; any administra- 12 tor, employee or volunteer in a nursing home or residential healthcare 13 facility that is licensed, certified or operated by the department of 14 health; any employee of a personal care or home health aide program; any 15 person or employee of any corporation, partnership, organization or 16 other entity which is under contract to provide patient care services in 17 a residential health care facility; an employee of a county adult 18 protective services agency; police officer; district attorney or assist- 19 ant district attorney; peace officer; investigator employed in the 20 office of a district attorney; or other law enforcement official; an 21 attorney so long as it does not violate the New York state rules of 22 professional conduct. 23 2. Any person who is required to investigate reports of abuse or 24 maltreatment and who has reasonable cause to suspect that a victim died 25 as a result of maltreatment or abuse shall immediately report the suspi- 26 cion to the central registry which shall convey the report through the 27 most expedient means available to the appropriate medical examiner and 28 law enforcement authorities, notwithstanding the existence of a death 29 certificate signed by a practicing physician. The medical examiner shall 30 accept the report for investigation and shall report the findings of the 31 investigation, in writing, to the appropriate law enforcement authori- 32 ties. 33 3. Reports of suspected elder abuse shall be made immediately by tele- 34 phone or by telephone facsimile on a form supplied by the commissioner 35 of the office of children and family services to the central registry. 36 Such telephone reports shall be followed by a report in writing within 37 twenty-four hours after such oral report. 38 § 473-p. Penalties for failure to report. Any person required by this 39 article to report a cause of suspected elder abuse or maltreatment who 40 willfully fails to do so shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Any 41 person required by this article to report a case of suspected elder 42 abuse or maltreatment who knowingly and willfully fails to do so shall 43 be civilly liable for the damages proximately caused by such failure. 44 § 473-q. Immunity from liability. Any person who in good faith makes a 45 report of allegations of elder abuse or maltreatment as required by this 46 title, including those who in good faith make a report to the wrong 47 recipient, shall have immunity from criminal liability which otherwise 48 result by reason of such actions. Any person who reasonably and in good 49 faith makes a report of allegations of elder abuse or maltreatment as 50 required by this title, shall have immunity from civil liability which 51 might otherwise result by reason of such actions. 52 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 29 to read 53 as follows: 54 ARTICLE 29 55 ELDER JUSTICE COORDINATING COUNCIL 56 Section 830. Elder justice coordinating council. S. 1828 4 1 § 830. Elder justice coordinating council. 1. The elder justice coor- 2 dinating council is hereby created within the executive department to 3 facilitate interagency planning and review specific agency initiatives 4 for their impact on the reporting and investigation of elder abuse and 5 maltreatment in the state, and to provide a forum for concerns and 6 discussion related to the formation of a comprehensive state policy 7 relating to elder abuse and maltreatment. The council shall have and 8 exercise the functions, powers, and duties provided by this article and 9 any other provision of law. 10 2. The council shall be comprised of twenty-one members as follows: 11 the commissioner of the office of children and family services, the 12 director of the office for the aging, the commissioner of the division 13 of criminal justice services, the commissioner of the department of 14 health, and the commissioner of the office of alcohol and substance 15 abuse services, and a representative from the department of law, who 16 shall serve ex officio and who may designate representatives to act on 17 their behalf. The governor shall appoint seven other members with exper- 18 tise in elder abuse and maltreatment issues, at least two of whom shall 19 represent not-for-profit corporations whose primary purpose is to 20 provide access to experts for the development of elder abuse and 21 maltreatment services and intervention, and at least two of whom who 22 shall represent law enforcement agencies that have expertise in the 23 investigation and prosecution of elder abuse or maltreatment. Eight 24 members shall be appointed by the governor on the recommendation of the 25 legislative leaders as follows: the temporary president of the senate 26 and the speaker of the assembly shall each recommend three members to 27 the council. One of the three members recommended by the temporary pres- 28 ident and one of the three members recommended by the speaker shall be a 29 family member, caregiver, or advocate of a person who has suffered from 30 elder abuse or maltreatment. One member shall be appointed on the recom- 31 mendation of the minority leader of the senate and one member shall be 32 appointed on the recommendation of the minority leader of the assembly. 33 The commissioner of the office of children and family services and the 34 director of the office for the aging shall serve, ex officio, as 35 co-chairs of the council. Administrative duties shall be the responsi- 36 bility of the office. The members of the council shall receive no 37 compensation for their services. 38 3. Within one year after the effective date of this section the coun- 39 cil shall establish community forums to gain input from consumers, 40 providers, key law enforcement agencies, medical professionals and other 41 interested parties to provide input and direction on developing a New 42 York state plan for the identification, investigation, and intervention 43 into cases of elder abuse and maltreatment. A community forum shall be 44 established in each of the following regions of the state: Long Island, 45 New York city, Northern Metropolitan New York, Northwestern New York, 46 Utica area, central New York, Rochester area, and western New York. 47 Such state plan shall include but not be limited to recommendations for 48 the implementation of a statewide central registry for the reporting of 49 suspected elder abuse and maltreatment, recommendations for the imple- 50 mentation of mandated reporting guidelines across the state, best prac- 51 tices in identifying elder abuse and maltreatment signs and symptoms, 52 the identification of best practices for law enforcement officials in 53 the identification, investigation, and prosecution of these cases, an 54 accounting of the incidence of these cases statewide, in addition to a 55 community assessment of the strengths and gaps in community and state S. 1828 5 1 support services, in order to coordinate services among various systems 2 and agencies, and any other recommendations. 3 4. The council shall meet quarterly or more frequently if its business 4 shall require. The community forums in the first year of implementation 5 count as a formal meeting of the council. The members of the council 6 shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel and 7 other expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of 8 their duties. The council shall provide reports to the governor and the 9 legislature on or before October first, two thousand twenty-six, and by 10 October first of every other year thereafter. Such reports shall include 11 recommendations for state policy relating to elder abuse and maltreat- 12 ment and a review of services initiated and coordinated among public and 13 private agencies to meet the needs of victims. 14 5. The office of children and family services shall serve as the focal 15 point to develop comprehensive coordinated responses of the various 16 state and local agencies with regard to elder abuse and maltreatment and 17 thus to ensure timely and appropriate responses to reports and investi- 18 gations. 19 6. The office of children and family services, in consultation with 20 the council, shall utilize data and information compiled and maintained 21 pursuant to this article to coordinate state funded research efforts to 22 ensure the most efficient use of funds available for the purposes of 23 this article. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect October 1, 2025; provided that section 25 one of this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.